North Dakota statutes. TITLE 10 Corporations
CHAPTER 10-33 Nonprofit Corporations
10-33-141.
Secretary of state — Enforcement — Penalty — Appeal.

The secretary of state may administer this chapter.

The secretary of state may propound to any corporation or foreign corporation that is subject to this chapter and to any officer, director, or employee thereof any interrogatory as may be reasonably necessary and proper to ascertain whether the corporation has complied with this chapter applicable to the corporation.

The interrogatory must be answered within thirty days after mailing or within any additional time as must be fixed by the secretary of state. The answers to the interrogatory must be full and complete and must be made in writing and under oath.

If the interrogatory is directed:

To an individual, it must be answered by that individual; or

To a corporation, it must be answered by the president, vice president, secretary, or assistant secretary of the corporation.

The secretary of state need not file any record to which the interrogatory relates until the interrogatory has been answered, and not then if the answers disclose that the record is not in conformity with this chapter.

The secretary of state shall certify to the attorney general, for action the attorney general may deem appropriate, an interrogatory and answers thereto, which discloses a violation of this chapter.

Each officer, director, or employee of a corporation or foreign corporation who fails or refuses within the time provided by subdivision a to answer truthfully and fully an interrogatory propounded to that person by the secretary of state is guilty of an infraction.

An interrogatory propounded by the secretary of state and the answers are not open to public inspection. The secretary of state may not disclose any facts or information obtained from the interrogatory or answers except insofar as may be permitted by law or insofar as is required for evidence in any criminal proceedings or other action by this state.

If the secretary of state rejects any record required by this chapter to be approved by the secretary of state before the record may be filed, then the secretary of state shall give written notice of the rejection to the person that delivered the record, specifying the reasons for rejection.

Within thirty days after the service of the notice of denial, the corporation or foreign corporation as the case may be, may appeal to the district court in the judicial district serving Burleigh County by filing with the clerk of the court a petition setting forth a copy of the record sought to be filed and a copy of the written rejection of the record by the secretary of state.

The matter must be tried de novo by the court. The court shall either sustain the action of the secretary of state or direct the secretary of state to take the action the court determines proper.

If the secretary of state dissolves a corporation or revokes the certificate of authority to conduct activities in this state of any foreign corporation, pursuant to section 10-33-141.3, the corporation or foreign corporation may appeal to the district court in the judicial district serving Burleigh County by filing with the clerk of the court a petition including:

A copy of the corporation’s articles of incorporation and a copy of the notice of dissolution given by the secretary of state; or

A copy of the foreign corporation’s certificate of authority to conduct activities in this state and a copy of the notice of revocation given by the secretary of state. The matter must be tried de novo by the court. The court shall sustain the action of the secretary of state or shall direct the secretary of state to take the action the court determines proper.

If the court order sought is one for reinstatement of a corporation that has been dissolved as provided in subsection 5 of section 10-33-139, or for reinstatement of the certificate of authority of a foreign corporation that has been revoked as provided in subsection 6 of section 10-33-139, then together with any other actions the court deems proper, any such order which reverses the decision of the secretary of state shall require the corporation or foreign corporation to:

File the most recent past-due annual report;

Pay the fees to the secretary of state for all past-due annual reports as provided in subdivision q of subsection 1 of section 10-33-140; and

Pay the reinstatement fee to the secretary of state as provided in subdivision q of subsection 1 of section 10-33-140.

Appeals from all final orders and judgments entered by the district court under this section in review of any ruling or decision of the secretary of state may be taken as in other civil actions.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 2005, ch. 100, § 114; 2009, ch. 106, §
57; 2015, ch. 86, § 14, effective August 1, 2015.

10-33-141.1.
Delivery to and filing of records by secretary of state and effective date.

A record authorized or required to be delivered to the secretary of state for filing under this chapter must be captioned to describe the purpose of the record, be in a medium permitted by the secretary of state, and be delivered to the secretary of state. If the secretary of state determines that a record complies with the filing requirements of this chapter, then the secretary of state shall file the record and return a copy of the filed record to the person that delivered it to the secretary of state for filing. That person shall then send a copy of the filed record to the person on whose behalf the record was filed.

Upon request and payment of a fee provided in section 10-33-139, the secretary of state shall send to the requester a certified copy of the requested record.

Except as otherwise specifically provided in this chapter, a record delivered to the secretary of state for filing under this chapter may specify a delayed effective date within ninety days. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a record filed by the secretary of state is effective:

If the record does not specify a delayed effective date within ninety days, then on the date the record is filed as evidenced by the endorsement of the secretary of state of the date on the record.

If the record specifies a delayed effective date within ninety days, then on the specified date.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 100, § 115.

10-33-141.2.
Correcting a filed record.

With respect to correction of a filed record:

Whenever a record authorized by this chapter to be filed with the secretary of state has been filed and inaccurately records the action referred to in the record, contains an inaccurate or erroneous statement, or was defectively or erroneously signed, sealed, acknowledged, or verified, the record may be corrected by filing a statement of correction.

A statement of correction:

Must:

Be signed by:

The person that signed the original record; or

By a person authorized to sign on behalf of that person;

Set forth the name of the corporation that filed the record;

Identify the record to be corrected by description and by the date of its filing with the secretary of state;

Identify the inaccuracy, error, or defect to be corrected; and

Set forth a statement in corrected form of the portion of the record to be corrected.

May not revoke or nullify the record.

The statement of correction must be filed with the secretary of state.

With respect to the effective date of correction:

A certificate issued by the secretary of state before a record is corrected, with respect to the effect of filing the original record, is considered to be applicable to the record as corrected as of the date the record as corrected is considered to have been filed under this subsection.

After a statement of correction has been filed with the secretary of state, the original record as corrected is considered to have been filed:

On the date the statement of correction was filed:

As to persons adversely affected by the correction; and

For the purposes of subsection 3 of section 10-33-01.2; and

On the date the original record was filed as to all other persons and for all other purposes.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 100, § 116.

10-33-141.3.
Secretary of state — Involuntary dissolution — Revocation of certificate of authority.

With respect to involuntary dissolution of a corporation by the secretary of state:

A corporation may be involuntarily dissolved by the secretary of state if:

The corporation has failed to appoint and maintain a registered agent and registered office as provided in section 10-33-12; or

A misrepresentation has been made of any material matter in any application, report, affidavit, or other record submitted by the corporation pursuant to this chapter.

A corporation may not be dissolved by the secretary of state as provided for in this section unless:

The secretary of state has given the corporation not less than sixty days’ notice by mail addressed to its registered agent at the registered office in this state or, if the corporation does not maintain a registered agent in this state, the notice must be mailed to its principal office; and

During the sixty-day period, the corporation has failed to:

File the report of change as provided in chapter 10-01.1 regarding the registered office or the registered agent;

File any other required record; or

Correct the misrepresentation.

Upon expiration of sixty days after the mailing of the notice, the existence of the corporation ceases. The secretary of state shall issue a notice of dissolution and shall mail the notice addressed to its registered agent at the registered office in this state or, if the corporation does not maintain a registered agent in this state, the notice must be mailed to its principal office.

With respect to the revocation of a certificate of authority of a foreign corporation by the secretary of state:

The certificate of a foreign corporation to transact business in this state may be revoked by the secretary of state if:

The foreign corporation has failed to:

Appoint and maintain a registered agent and registered office as provided in section 10-33-131;

File with the secretary of state any amendment to its application for a certificate of authority as provided in section 10-33-130;

File with the secretary of state any merger as provided in section 10-33-132; or

File with the secretary of state an application for certificate of withdrawal of its authority as provided in section 10-33-133 when the corporation’s existence has expired or the foreign corporation has been dissolved in the jurisdiction of the foreign corporation; or

A misrepresentation has been made of any material matter in any application, report, affidavit, or other record submitted by the foreign corporation under this chapter.

A certificate of authority may not be revoked by the secretary of state as provided for in this section unless:

The secretary of state has given the foreign corporation not less than sixty days’ notice by mail addressed to its registered agent at the registered office in this state or, if the corporation failed to maintain a registered agent in this state, the notice must be mailed to its principal office; and

During the sixty-day period, the foreign corporation has failed to:

File the report of change as provided in chapter 10-01.1 regarding the registered office or the registered agent;

File any amendment;

File any merger;

File an application for withdrawal;

File any other required record; or

Correct the misrepresentation.

Upon expiration of sixty days after the mailing of the notice, the authority of the foreign corporation to transact business in this state ceases. The secretary of state shall issue a notice of revocation and shall mail the notice to the registered agent at the registered office in this state or, if the foreign corporation failed to maintain a registered agent in this state, the notice must be mailed to its principal office.

If the corporation or foreign corporation files a report of change relating to the registered agent or any other required record or correction of a misrepresentation after the notice with the fee provided for in section 10-33-140, the secretary of state shall restore the certificate of incorporation or authority to good standing. Until restored to good standing, the secretary of state may not accept for filing any document respecting the corporation or foreign corporation except those incident to its dissolution or withdrawal.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 86, § 15, effective August 1, 2015.

10-33-142.
Secretary of state — Evidence.

All certificates issued by the secretary of state and all copies of records filed in accordance with this chapter, when certified by the secretary of state, may be taken and received in all courts, public offices, and official bodies as evidence of the facts stated.

A certificate by the secretary of state under the great seal of this state, as to the existence or nonexistence of the facts relating to corporations which would not appear from a certified copy of any of the foregoing records or certificates, may be taken and received in all courts, public offices, and official bodies as evidence of the existence or nonexistence of the facts stated.

Any certificate or certified copy issued by the secretary of state under this section may be created and disseminated as an electronic record with the same force and effect as if produced in a paper form.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 2005, ch. 100, § 117; 2011, ch. 87, § 61.

10-33-142.1.
Secretary of state — Confidential records.

Any social security number or federal tax identification number disclosed or contained in any record filed with the secretary of state under this chapter is confidential. The secretary of state shall delete or obscure any social security number or federal tax identification number before a copy of any record is released to the public.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 85, § 117; 2005, ch. 100, § 118.

10-33-143.
Secretary of state — Forms.

All annual reports required by this chapter to be filed in the office of the secretary of state must be made on forms prescribed by the secretary of state. Forms for all other records to be filed in the office of the secretary of state may be furnished by the secretary of state upon request. However, the use of the forms, unless otherwise specifically required by law, is not mandatory.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 2005, ch. 100, § 119.

10-33-144.
Transaction by a nonprofit corporation operating or controlling a hospital or nursing home — Notice to attorney general — Waiting period.

A nonprofit corporation operating or controlling a hospital or nursing home shall notify the attorney general in writing before closing an agreement or a transaction that will:

Sell, lease, transfer, exchange, option, convey, or otherwise dispose of to a for-profit corporation or entity or a nonprofit corporation or entity if fifty percent or more of the assets of the selling corporation are involved in the agreement or transaction;

Transfer control, responsibility, or governance of fifty percent or more of the assets or operations of the nonprofit corporation to a for-profit corporation or entity or another nonprofit corporation or entity; or

Result in any for-profit corporation or entity or another nonprofit corporation or entity having control of, governance of, or the power to direct management and policies of the nonprofit corporation operating or controlling a hospital, nursing home, or related organization.

The substitution of a new corporate member that transfers the control of, responsibility for, or governance of the nonprofit corporation, the substitution of a member of the governing body, or any arrangement, written or oral, that would transfer voting control of the entity, is a transfer for purposes of this section.

This section applies to a foreign nonprofit corporation that operates or controls a hospital or nursing home within this state.

This section does not apply to the following transactions:

An action involving the enforcement or foreclosure of a security interest, lien, mortgage, judgment, or other creditor rights.

Agreements or transactions in the usual and regular course of the nonprofit corporation’s business and activities.

The notice must be provided to the attorney general not less than ninety days before the closing date of the proposed agreement or transaction and must include:

The names and addresses of all parties to the proposed agreement or transaction;

The terms of the proposed agreement or transaction, including the proposed sale price;

A copy of the proposed agreement or transaction; and

Any financial or economic analysis by an expert or independent consultant retained by the nonprofit corporation which addresses the criteria set forth in section 10-33-145.

A nonprofit corporation doing business as a hospital or nursing home may neither transfer nor convey any assets or control through an agreement or transaction described in this section until ninety days after the corporation gives the attorney general notice required under this section, unless the attorney general waives all or part of the waiting period. The waiting period may be extended for one or more additional sixty-day periods upon agreement between the corporation and the attorney general, or pursuant to a court order.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 97, § 4; 2003, ch. 86, § 1.

10-33-145.
Transaction by a nonprofit corporation or entity operating or controlling a hospital or nursing home — Attorney general’s powers and duties — Experts — Continuing appropriation.

Upon receipt of a notice under section 10-33-144, the attorney general may review and investigate the proposed agreement or transaction and may require the nonprofit corporation or entity operating or controlling a hospital or nursing home and the other parties to the agreement or transaction to provide to the attorney general any additional information relevant to the review or investigation of the proposed agreement or transaction.

Upon receipt of a notice under section 10-33-144, the attorney general may review the proposed agreement or transaction to determine whether consummation of the proposed agreement or transaction by the nonprofit corporation or entity operating or controlling a hospital or nursing home is consistent with the purposes of the nonprofit corporation or entity operating or controlling a hospital or nursing home and the fiduciary obligations of the officers and directors of the nonprofit corporation or entity operating or controlling a hospital or nursing home and is in accordance with law. The attorney general shall consider the following factors in reviewing and evaluating a proposed agreement or transaction:

Whether appropriate steps were taken by the nonprofit corporation or entity operating or controlling a hospital or nursing home to safeguard restricted assets transferred to the acquiring entity;

Whether appropriate steps were taken by the nonprofit corporation or entity operating or controlling a hospital or nursing home to ensure that any proceeds of the proposed agreement or transaction are used for purposes consistent with restrictions placed on assets of and with the purposes of the nonprofit corporation or entity operating or controlling a hospital or nursing home;

Whether the terms and conditions of the proposed agreement or transaction are fair and reasonable to the nonprofit corporation or entity operating or controlling a hospital or nursing home, including whether the nonprofit corporation or entity operating or controlling the hospital or nursing home will receive fair market value for its assets and, in a proposed agreement or transaction involving a nursing home, whether the proposed agreement or transaction constitutes a bona fide transaction;

Whether any conflict of interest or breach of fiduciary duty exists or was disclosed, including any conflict of interest or breach of fiduciary duty related to directors and officers of, executives of, and experts retained by the nonprofit corporation or entity operating or controlling a hospital or nursing home and any other party to the agreement or transaction;

Whether the agreement or transaction will result in inurement, pecuniary gain, or excess benefit to any person associated with the nonprofit corporation or entity operating or controlling a hospital or nursing home or to any other person;

Whether the transaction is in the best interests of the nonprofit corporation or entity operating or controlling a hospital or nursing home; and

Whether the transaction is authorized by the nonprofit corporation’s governing records.

For the purpose of reviewing and evaluating the factors identified in subsection 2, the attorney general may retain experts if necessary and reasonable and may obtain public comment regarding the proposed agreement or transaction. A contract entered by the attorney general with an expert under this section does not require a bid and is exempt from chapters 44-08 and 54-44.4. If the attorney general intends to seek payment from the nonprofit corporation or entity operating or controlling a hospital or nursing home for the cost of any expert retained under this subsection, at least five days before retaining that expert, the attorney general shall notify the nonprofit corporation or entity operating or controlling a hospital or nursing home of the expert cost projected to be incurred. A nonprofit corporation or entity operating or controlling a hospital or nursing home which receives notice under this subsection shall pay the reasonable cost of any retained expert. If the nonprofit corporation or entity operating or controlling a hospital or nursing home objects to paying the costs of an expert, the corporation or entity may seek a district court order limiting the corporation’s or entity’s liability for the costs. In determining whether to issue an order, the court shall consider whether the expert is necessary and reasonable and the cost of the expert relative to the value of the proposed agreement or transaction.

Section 44-04-18.4 applies to any information provided to the attorney general under sections 10-33-144 through 10-33-147.

All costs, fees, and other moneys received under sections 10-33-144 through 10-33-149 must be deposited into the attorney general’s operating fund. The moneys in the fund are appropriated to pay the costs incurred in the attorney general’s performance of responsibilities pursuant to sections 10-33-144 through 10-33-149.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 97, § 5; 2003, ch. 86, § 2; 2005, ch. 100, § 120.

10-33-146.
Transaction by a nonprofit corporation or entity operating or controlling a hospital or nursing home — Notice of decision — Public meeting — Meeting notice.

Within ninety days of receipt of the written notice required under section 10-33-144, and such other additional extension of time permitted or provided under section 10-33-144, the attorney general shall notify, in writing, the nonprofit corporation or entity operating or controlling a hospital or nursing home of the attorney general’s decision to approve, deny, or take any other action on the proposed agreement or transaction. Before issuing a written decision under this section, the attorney general may conduct one or more public hearings, one of which must be held in the county where the hospital or nursing home is located. At a public hearing under this section, the attorney general shall request and receive comments from any interested person regarding the proposed agreement or transaction. At least fourteen days before a public hearing under this section, the attorney general shall provide notice of the meeting by publication in the official newspaper of the city in which the hospital or nursing home is located. The attorney general shall also provide notice of the meeting to the governing body of the county in which the hospital or nursing home is located, if applicable, and to the governing body of the city in which the hospital or nursing home is located, if applicable. Any party to the agreement may institute legal proceedings in the district court of the county in which the hospital or nursing home is located to review the attorney general’s decision. In a district court action brought under this section, the attorney general’s decision is subject to de novo review by the court. In a proceeding under this section, the attorney general must be served with notice and is entitled to be heard. If the attorney general substantially prevails in a proceeding under this section, the attorney general is entitled to an award of attorney’s fees, investigation fees, costs, and expenses of any investigation and proceeding under this section. The court shall award attorney’s fees to the attorney general under this section based upon the hourly rates the attorney general charges to state agencies for the attorney general’s legal services. A court may not apply the limitation on the rate of the attorney general’s attorney’s fees under this section as a limitation on an award of attorney’s fees to the attorney general under any other section.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 97, § 6; 2003, ch. 86, § 3.

10-33-147.
Transaction by a nonprofit corporation or entity operating or controlling a hospital or nursing home — Attorney general decision.

The attorney general may bring proceedings to secure compliance with sections 10-33-144 through 10-33-149 in the district court of the county in which the hospital or nursing home is located. If the attorney general determines consummation of the proposed transaction or agreement is not consistent with the fiduciary obligations of the nonprofit corporation or entity operating or controlling a hospital or nursing home and the corporation’s officers and directors, or is not in accordance with law, the attorney general may bring proceedings in the district court of the county in which the hospital or nursing home is located to enjoin the consummation of the proposed transaction or agreement or to secure any other relief available under the law. In a district court action brought under this section, the attorney general’s decision is subject to de novo review by the court. If the attorney general substantially prevails in an action brought under this section, the attorney general is entitled to an award of attorney’s fees, investigation fees, costs, and expenses of any investigation and action brought under this section. The court shall award attorney’s fees to the attorney general under this section based upon the hourly rates the attorney general charges to state agencies for the attorney general’s legal services. A court may not apply the limitation on the rate of the attorney general’s attorney’s fees under this section as a limitation on an award of attorney’s fees to the attorney general under any other section. Failure of the attorney general to take action on a proposed agreement or transaction described in sections 10-33-144 through 10-33-149 does not constitute approval of the transaction and does not prevent the attorney general from taking other action.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 97, § 7; 2003, ch. 86, § 4.

10-33-148.
Investigation — Subpoena — Hearing — Powers of the attorney general.

In discharging the attorney general’s responsibilities under sections 10-33-144 through 10-33-149, and in connection with the public hearing provided for in section 10-33-146, the attorney general may conduct investigations, issue subpoenas to any person directly related to the proposed agreement or transaction, and conduct hearings in aid of an investigation or inquiry.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 86, § 5.

10-33-149.
Authority of the attorney general or a court is not impaired.

Sections 10-33-144 through 10-33-148 are in addition to, and do not supersede, any other authority of the attorney general established by statute, case law, or common law.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 86, § 6.